Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
COSTS

Note

Part heading added by L 1972, c 143, §1(n).

§624-35 Costs. The costs of
depositions may be taxed in the bill of costs as provided by section 607-9. [L
1876, c 32, §9; RL 1925, §2575; RL 1935, §3869; RL 1945, §9855; RL 1955, §223-5;
HRS §624-35; am L 1972, c 143, §1(g)]

Case Notes

No abuse of discretion found in trial judge taxing cost
against losing party. 9 H. 563 (1894).

Commissioner's fee is item of cost. 12 H. 83 (1899).

Attorney for losing party responsible for costs of
commission. 19 H. 319 (1909).

Fees of foreign attorney taking deposition. 49 H. 311, 417
P.2d 636 (1966).

Costs recoverable where depositions necessarily obtained for
use in the case. 5 H. App. 558, 705 P.2d 535 (1985).

Cited: 31 H. 242, 249 (1930).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next